tests/checkcompoundpattern5.aff
# a CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN condition flag may arrive through an affix continuation class
FLAG long
COMPOUNDMIN 3
COMPOUNDBEGIN CB
COMPOUNDEND CE

CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 1
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /A1 /A2

PFX PA Y 1
PFX PA 0 xx/A1 .

SFX SA Y 1
SFX SA 0 yy/A2 .
